Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Strategic Planning

154.10-100.
Statewide network for information transfer and assistance — Purpose. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2018 ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.10-120.
Preparation of state strategic plan for economic development. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2018 ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.10-125.
Content and effect of strategic economic development plan. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2018 ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.

154.10-140.
Benchmarks to measure performance of economy and progress — Periodic evaluations of projects and programs. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2018 ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.